Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2611.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Disciplinary action” means any action taken against a licensed landscape architect for unprofessional conduct.

“Landscape architect” means a person who complies with all provisions of this chapter and is licensed by the Director to engage in the practice of landscape architecture.

“License” means an authorization granted by the Director to practice landscape architecture.

“Practice of landscape architecture” means any service where landscape architectural education, training, experience, and the application of mathematical, physical, and social science principles are applied in consultation, evaluation, planning, and design, including the preparation and filing of drawings, plans, specifications, and other contract documents and the administration of contracts relative to projects principally directed at the functional and aesthetic development, use, or preservation of land that directly affects the health, safety, and welfare of the public. These services include the implementation of land development concepts and natural resource management plans through the design or grading of: land forms; on-site, surface, and storm water drainage; soil conservation and erosion control; small water features; pedestrian, bicycle, and local motor vehicular circulation systems; and related construction details.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2612.
Prohibition and enforcement.

No person shall:

Practice or attempt to practice landscape architecture or hold himself or herself as being able to do so in this State without first obtaining a valid license as required by this chapter.

Use the title “landscape architect,” “landscape architecture,” or “landscape architectural” in connection with the person’s name without being duly licensed under this chapter.

No person licensed under this chapter shall:

stamp or seal documents with his or her landscape architect seal if his or her license has expired or is revoked or suspended;

practice or attempt to practice landscape architecture during license revocation or suspension;

engage in unprofessional conduct;

violate any provisions of this chapter.

A person who willfully violates any provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

The administrative law officer may bring an action for injunctive relief to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2613.
Exemptions.

This chapter shall not affect or prevent:

the practice of architecture, land surveying, engineering, or other licensed profession by persons not licensed under this chapter;

drafters, clerks, project managers, superintendents, students, and other employees or interns from acting under the instructions, control, or supervision of their employers;

the construction, alteration, or supervision of sites by contractors or superintendents employed by contractors or the preparation of shop drawings in connection with the construction, alteration, or supervision;

owners or contractors from engaging persons who are not landscape architects to observe and supervise site construction of a project;

the preparation of construction documents showing plantings, other horticulture-related elements, or landscape materials unrelated to horticulture;

individuals from making plans, drawings, or specifications for any property owned by them and for their own personal use;

the design of irrigation systems; or

officers or employees of the federal government from working in connection with their employment.

This section shall not be construed to permit a person not licensed as provided in this chapter to use the title landscape architect or any title, sign, card, or device to indicate that the person is a landscape architect.

This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict in any manner the right of a practitioner of another profession or occupation from carrying on in the usual manner any of the functions of that profession or occupation as their experience, education, and training allow them to practice, including the professions of landscape design, garden design, planning, forestry, and forestry management.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.